Illinois, session 104th, HB5779.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $900,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Public Health for a grant to 7the Link and Option Center, Inc., for the purpose of operating 8a mobile health clinic in south suburban Cook County. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.